Washington statutes.
RCW 43.235.800

Statewide report.

A biennial statewide report shall be issued by the coordinating entity in December of even-numbered years, ending in 2010. The coordinating entity may subsequently issue periodic reports containing recommendations on policy changes that would improve program performance, and issues identified through the work of the regional panels. Copies of this report shall be distributed to the governor, to the appropriate legislative committees, and to those agencies involved in the regional domestic violence fatality review panels.

[ 2011 c 105 s 3; 2000 c 50 s 7.]